Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.050

Joint school districts—Elections for director.

The registered voters residing within a joint school district shall be entitled to vote on the office of school director of their district.

Jurisdiction of any such election shall rest with the county auditor of the county administering such joint district as provided in RCW 28A.323.040.

At each general election, or upon approval of a request for a special election as provided for in RCW 29A.04.330, such county auditor shall:

(1) See that there shall be at least one polling place in each county;

(2) At least twenty days prior to the elections concerned, certify in writing to the superintendent of the school district the number and location of the polling places established by such auditor for such regular or special elections; and

(3) Do all things otherwise required by law for the conduct of such election.

It is the intention of this section that the qualified electors of a joint school district shall not be forced to go to a different polling place on the same day when other elections are being held to vote for school directors of their district.

[ 2015 c 53 s 8; 1990 c 33 s 311; 1983 c 56 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 97; 1973 c 47 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 133; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.255. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 23. Formerly RCW 28A.315.390, 28A.57.255, 28.57.255.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Severability—1973 c 47: See note following RCW 28A.323.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.